Utah statutes.
13-5-15.   Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person, whether as principal, agent, officer or director, for himself or for another person, who knowingly violates this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor for each violation. Upon conviction he shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $5,000, or by imprisonment not to exceed 12 months or by both.



Amended by Chapter 58, 1983 General Session

